vi: Hệ thống điều chỉnh kèn harmonica diatonic: Country; Thứ hòa âm; Melody Maker; Thứ tự nhiên; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Hệ điều âm Wilde; Khác
en: Diatonic harmonica tuning system: Country; Harmonic minor; Melody Maker; Natural minor; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde tuning; Other
cs: Systém ladění diatonické harmoniky: Country; Harmonická mollová; Melody Maker; Přirozená mollová; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richterovo; Spirálové; Ladění Wilde; Ostatní
ja: ダイアトニックハーモニカチューニングシステム: カントリー; ハーモニックマイナー; メロディーメーカー; ナチュラルマイナー; パディ・リヒター; パワーベンダー; リヒター; スパイラル; ワイルドチューニング; その他
fi: Diatonisen huuliharpun viritysjärjestelmä: Country; Harmoninen molli; Melody Maker; Luonnollinen molli; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiraali; Wilde-vire; Muu
nb: Stemmesystem for diatonisk munnspill: Country; Harmonisk moll; Melody Maker; Naturlig moll; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde-stemming; Annet
pt-PT: Sistema de afinação da harmónica diatónica: Country; Menor harmónica; Melody Maker; Menor natural; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Espiral; Afinação Wilde; Outro
sv: Stämningssystem för munspel: Country; Harmonisk moll; Melody Maker; Naturlig moll; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde-stämning; Övrigt
th: ระบบการปรับเสียงฮาร์โมนิกาแบบไดอาโทนิก: คันทรี; ฮาร์โมนิกไมเนอร์; เมโลดี้เมกเกอร์; เนเชอรัลไมเนอร์; แพดดี้ ริชเตอร์; พาวเวอร์เบนเดอร์; ริชเตอร์; สไปรัล; ไวลด์ทูนนิ่ง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Diatoninės lūpinės armonikėlės derinimo sistema: „Country“; Harmoninis minoras; „Melody Maker“; Natūralusis minoras; „Paddy Richter“; „PowerBender“; „Richter“; Spiralinis; „Wilde“ derinimas; Kita
fr: Système d'accordage de l'harmonica diatonique: Country; Mineur harmonique; Melody Maker; Mineur naturel; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spirale; Accordage Wilde; Autre
pl: System strojenia harmonijki diatonicznej: Country; Mollowy harmoniczny; Melody Maker; Mollowy naturalny; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiralny; Wilde tuning; Inny
tr: Diyatonik mızıka akort sistemi: Country; Harmonik minör; Melody Maker; Doğal minör; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde akordu; Diğer
sl-SI: Sistem uglasitve diatonične ustne harmonike: Country; Harmonična molova lestvica; Melody Maker; Naravna molova lestvica; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiralna; Uglasitev Wilde; Drugo
ko: 다이아토닉 하모니카 튜닝 시스템: 컨트리; 하모닉 마이너; 멜로디 메이커; 내추럴 마이너; 패디 릭터; 파워벤더; 릭터; 스파이럴; 와일드 튜닝; 기타
hu: Diatonikus szájharmonika hangolási rendszere: Country; Harmonikus moll; Melody Maker; Természetes moll; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spirál; Wilde-hangolás; Egyéb
de: Stimmsystem für diatonische Mundharmonika: Country; Harmonisch Moll; Melody Maker; Natürlich Moll; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde-Stimmung; Sonstige
nl: Stemsysteem diatonische mondharmonica: Country; Harmonisch mineur; Melody Maker; Natuurlijk mineur; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiraal; Wilde-stemming; Overig
sk-SK: Systém ladenia diatonickej harmoniky: Country; Harmonická mol; Melody Maker; Prirodzená mol; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde ladenie; Iné
it: Sistema di accordatura dell'armonica diatonica: Country; Minore armonica; Melody Maker; Minore naturale; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; A spirale; Accordatura Wilde; Altro
da: Stemmesystem til diatonisk mundharmonika: Country; Harmonisk mol; Melody Maker; Ren mol; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde-stemning; Andet
bg-BG: Система на настройка на диатонична хармоника: Кънтри; Хармоничен минор; Melody Maker; Естествен минор; Пади Рихтер; PowerBender; Рихтер; Спирална; Wilde; Друго
ro-RO: Sistemul de acordare al armonicii diatonice: Country; Minor armonic; Melody Maker; Minor natural; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Acordaj Wilde; Altele
hr-HR: Sustav za ugađanje dijatonske usne harmonike: Country; Harmonijski mol; Melody Maker; Prirodni mol; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiralni; Wilde tuning; Ostalo
el: Σύστημα κουρδίσματος διατονικής φυσαρμόνικας: Country; Αρμονική ελάσσονα; Melody Maker; Φυσική ελάσσονα; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Κούρδισμα Wilde; Άλλο
pt-BR: Sistema de afinação da gaita diatônica: Country; Menor harmônica; Melody Maker; Menor natural; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Espiral; Afinação Wilde; Outro
zh-TW: 全音階口琴調音系統: 鄉村; 和聲小調; Melody Maker; 自然小調; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Spiral; Wilde 調音; 其他
ru: Система настройки диатонической губной гармоники: Кантри; Гармонический минор; Melody Maker; Натуральный минор; Пэдди Рихтер; PowerBender; Рихтеровский строй; Спиральный строй; Строй Уайлда; Другое
es: Sistema de afinación de armónica diatónica: Country; Menor armónica; Melody Maker; Menor natural; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; Espiral; Afinación Wilde; Otro
zh-CN: 全音阶口琴调音系统: 乡村; 和声小调; Melody Maker; 自然小调; Paddy Richter; PowerBender; Richter; 螺旋式; Wilde 调音; 其他